District of Columbia statutes.
7-761.06a

Reporting requirements.

(a)

The Mayor shall publish reports on persons seeking and receiving services from the Department. Each report shall provide a monthly and year-to-date statistical profile of:

(1)

Persons who have applied for services, organized by:

(A)

Referral source;

(B)

Application status; and

(C)

Average length of time spent in each stage of the application process;

(2)

Eligible persons who have requested but not yet received one or more services, organized by service type;

(3)

Persons receiving services, organized by service type; and

(4)

Persons terminated from services, organized by reason for termination.

(b)

The Mayor shall publish the reports required under subsection (a) of this section on a bimonthly basis throughout fiscal year 2010 and on a quarterly basis thereafter, no later than the 15th day following the end of the month or quarter for which the report is required.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-264, § 106a
as added Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 5071(b), 57 DCR 181
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5071(b) of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5071(b) of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).